Oregon, session 2026R1, HB4039.
Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. Section 2 of this 2026 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 414.
SECTION 2. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Base data” means the eligibility, enrollment, encounter and other data used by the
Oregon Health Authority to develop capitation rates for the following year.
(b) “Capitation rate” means a fixed dollar amount paid per member per month by the
authority to a coordinated care organization for the provision of medical assistance to
members of the coordinated care organization.
(2) The authority shall establish a transparent and data-driven process for developing
capitation rates. As part of the rate development process, the authority shall:
(a) Reconcile the authority’s base data with data submitted by coordinated care organ-
izations and identify any adjustments that the authority makes to the base data.
(b) Identify any material cost impact of changes made in a proposed contract or annual
contract restatement and include that information in the report required under paragraph
(e) of this subsection. In analyzing any material cost impact of contract changes, the au-
thority shall separately identify the cost of the previous year’s contractual requirements and
the cost of the new requirements in the proposed contract or contract restatement.
(c) Provide to each coordinated care organization a list of any outlier trends that appear
to be affecting statewide average data.
(d) Provide to interested parties 90 days’ notice of discretionary changes to the
authority’s schedule of fee-for-service reimbursement rates and, when necessary, make ap-
propriate adjustments to the capitation rates developed under this section.
(e) Timely report the authority’s preliminary capitation rate determinations to the
Oregon Health Policy Board. The report shall include the extent of the authority’s commu-
nity engagement and input received from entities that serve medical assistance recipients in
developing the preliminary capitation rates.
SECTION 3. Section 2 of this 2026 Act applies to plan years beginning on or after January
1, 2027.
SECTION 4. ORS 414.065 is amended to read:
Enrolled House Bill 4039 (HB 4039-A) Page 1

414.065. (1)(a) Consistent with ORS 414.690, 414.710, 414.712 and, 414.766 and section 2 of this
2026 Act and other statutes governing the provision of and payments for health services in medical
assistance, the Oregon Health Authority shall determine, subject to such revisions as it may make
from time to time and to legislative funding:
(A) The types and extent of health services to be provided to each eligible group of recipients
of medical assistance.
(B) Standards, including outcome and quality measures, to be observed in the provision of health
services.
(C) The number of days of health services toward the cost of which medical assistance funds
will be expended in the care of any person.
(D) Reasonable fees, charges, daily rates and global payments for meeting the costs of providing
health services to an applicant or recipient.
(E) Reasonable fees for professional medical and dental services which may be based on usual
and customary fees in the locality for similar services.
(F) The amount and application of any copayment or other similar cost-sharing payment that the
authority may require a recipient to pay toward the cost of health services.
(b) The authority shall adopt rules establishing timelines for payment of health services under
paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(2) In making the determinations under subsection (1) of this section and in the imposition of
any utilization controls on access to health services, the authority may not consider a quality of life
in general measure, either directly or by considering a source that relies on a quality of life in
general measure.
(3) The types and extent of health services and the amounts to be paid in meeting the costs
thereof, as determined and fixed by the authority and within the limits of funds available therefor,
shall be the total available for medical assistance, and payments for such medical assistance shall
be the total amounts from medical assistance funds available to providers of health services in
meeting the costs thereof.
(4) Except for payments under a cost-sharing plan, payments made by the authority for medical
assistance shall constitute payment in full for all health services for which such payments of medical
assistance were made.
(5) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, the Department of Human Services shall be
responsible for determining the payment for Medicaid-funded long term care services and for con-
tracting with the providers of long term care services.
(6) In determining a global budget for a coordinated care organization pursuant to section 2
of this 2026 Act:
(a) The allocation of the payment, the risk and any cost savings shall be determined by the
governing body of the organization;
(b) The authority shall consider the community health assessment conducted by the organization
in accordance with ORS 414.577 and reviewed annually, and the organization’s health care costs;
and
(c) The authority shall take into account the organization’s provision of innovative, nontradi-
tional health services.
(7) Under the supervision of the Governor, the authority may work with the Centers for Medi-
care and Medicaid Services to develop, in addition to global budgets, payment streams:
(a) To support improved delivery of health care to recipients of medical assistance; and
(b) That are funded by coordinated care organizations, counties or other entities other than the
state whose contributions qualify for federal matching funds under Title XIX or XXI of the Social
Security Act.
SECTION 5. ORS 413.042 is amended to read:
413.042. (1) In accordance with applicable provisions of ORS chapter 183, the Director of the
Oregon Health Authority may adopt rules necessary for the administration of the laws that the
Oregon Health Authority is charged with administering.
Enrolled House Bill 4039 (HB 4039-A) Page 2

(2) Before adopting any permanent or temporary rule, except a procedural rule, the au-
thority shall prepare a medical assistance cost impact statement that estimates the eco-
nomic impact of the adoption of the rule on the state medical assistance program. The
authority shall adopt the form of the statement.
SECTION 6. This 2026 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and this 2026 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by House February 17, 2026 Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Approved:
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Passed by Senate March 2, 2026
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
.................................................................................. ........................M.,........................................................., 2026
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 4039 (HB 4039-A) Page 3